Washington statutes.
RCW 43.131.430

Port district noise mitigation grant program—Repeal.

The following acts or parts of acts, as now existing or hereafter amended, are each repealed, effective July 1, 2030:

(1) RCW 43.330.610 and 2024 c 194 s 5; and

(2) RCW 53.20.090 and 2024 c 194 s 6.

[ 2024 c 194 s 9.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Intent—2024 c 194: See note following RCW 53.54.030.